District of Columbia statutes.
7-2049

Repeal of existing regulations.

The Child Development Facilities Regulation shall remain in effect until superseded by rules issued by the Mayor. Upon the effective date of rules promulgated pursuant to this subchapter, the Child Development Facilities Regulation shall be deemed repealed.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 20, 46 DCR 274
1981 Ed., § 6-3639.
See notes to § 7-2031.
For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.
Delegation of authority pursuant to D.C. Act 12-206, the “Child Development Facilities Regulation Emergency Act of 1997”, see Mayor’s Order 98-43, April 7, 1998 ( 45 DCR 2688).